Hawaii statutes.
[§663A-2] Damages and penalties. (a)
Any person who takes possession of any merchandise displayed or offered for
sale by any mercantile establishment without the consent of the owner and with
the intention of converting such merchandise to the individual's own use
without having paid the purchase price thereof, who alters the price indicia of
such merchandise, or who takes any other action that constitutes the offense of
shoplifting, shall be civilly liable to the owner of the mercantile
establishment for either:

(1) Actual damages and a civil penalty of $75, if a
written demand is made pursuant to subsection (e), for the actual damages and
this civil penalty; or

(2) Actual damages, a civil penalty of $75, and an
additional civil penalty of not less than $50 nor more than $500, to recover
the costs and expenses of bringing a civil suit, as determined by the court.

(b) A conviction for theft under section
708-830 to 708-833 is not a condition precedent to the maintenance of a civil
action under this section.

(c) A civil liability under this section is
not limited by another law that limits liability of parents or minor children.

(d) An action for recovery of damages and the
assessment of the civil penalties under this section may be brought in any court
of competent jurisdiction, including the small claims division of a district
court.

(e) The fact that an owner of a mercantile
establishment may bring an action against an individual for damages as provided
in this section shall not limit the right of the owner of a mercantile
establishment to demand, in writing, prior to the commencement of any legal
action, that a person who is liable for damages under this section remit said
damages and the amount of civil penalty allowed in section 663A-2.

(f) Judgments, but not claims, arising under
this section may be assigned. [L 1985, c 275, pt of §1]

Cross References

Shoplifting penalties, see §708-833.5.

Unlawful removal of shopping carts, see §633-16.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next